Louisiana, session 2026, HB811.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Code of Criminal Procedure Article 316(4) through (10) are hereby
amended and reenacted and Code of Criminal Procedure Article 316(11) is hereby enacted
to read as follows:
Art. 316. Factors in fixing amount of bail
The amount of bail shall be fixed in an amount that will ensure the presence
of the defendant, as required, and the safety of any other person and the community,
having regard to:
* * *
(4) When the offense charged is domestic abuse battery, any arrest records
of the defendant from the previous five years which alleged domestic abuse battery
but did not result in a conviction.
(4) (5) The ability of the defendant to give bail.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1171 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 811
(5) (6) The nature and seriousness of the danger to any other person or the
community that would be posed by the defendant's release.
(6) (7) The defendant's voluntary participation in a pretrial drug testing
program.
(7) (8) The absence or presence in the defendant of any controlled dangerous
substance.
(8) (9) Whether the defendant is currently out on a bail undertaking on a
previous felony arrest for which he is awaiting institution of prosecution,
arraignment, trial, or sentencing.
(9) (10) Any other circumstances affecting the probability of defendant's
appearance.
(10) (11) The type or form of bail.